Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1042.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6124 of Title 64 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6124. Grant applications and process.* * *(i) Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.-- A project funded by a program must comply with the requirements of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act. The following shall apply:(1) The authority shall include information about the requirements of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act in grant announcements, grant application materials and grant agreements.(2) The Department of Labor and Industry shall create 12345678910111213141516171819 additional classifications relevant to high-speed broadband service infrastructure projects or other broadband projects allowable under Federal law or guidance, including, at a minimum:(i) Teledata lineman/technician.(ii) Teledata groundman.(iii) Teledata cable splicer.(3) When creating additional classifications under paragraph (2), the Department of Labor and Industry shall:(i) Review wage determinations issued by the United States Department of Labor for similar projects in accordance with 40 U.S.C. § 3142 (relating to rate of wages for laborers and mechanics).(ii) P rovide a variety of applicants with the opportunity to participate in labor market surveys when determining the prevailing minimum wages for each additional classification.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1042PN1229 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718